Wisconsin, session 2025, SB550.
do enact as follows:SB550,14Section 1. 20.370 (1) (mu) of the statutes is amended to read:SB550,2,9520.370 (1) (mu) General program operations — state funds. The amounts in 1the schedule for general program operations that are conducted under ss. 23.09 to 223.11, 27.01, 30.203, 30.277, and 90.21, and chs. 29 and 169, for activities conducted 3under the ecological inventory and monitoring program of the endangered 4resources program, for the aquatic and terrestrial resources inventory under s. 523.09 (2) (km), for deer carcass disposal sites under s. 29.063 (7), for chronic wasting 6disease education, for providing the signage required under s. 23.118, and for 7payments of $53,700 in each fiscal year, to be credited to the appropriation account 8under s. 20.285 (1) (k), to the University of Wisconsin System for outdoor skills 9training under s. 29.598.SB550,210Section 2. 29.063 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB550,2,141129.063 (7) The department shall provide large metal containers where 12hunters may dispose of deer carcasses in locations throughout the state as 13determined by the department. The department shall regularly dispose of any 14carcasses placed in the containers.SB550,315Section 3. Fiscal changes.SB550,2,2216(1) Deer carcass disposal sites. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 17appropriation to the department of natural resources under s. 20.370 (1) (mu), the 18dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $500,000 to provide deer 19carcass disposal sites under s. 29.063 (7). In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the 20appropriation to the department of natural resources under s. 20.370 (1) (mu), the 21dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $500,000 to provide deer 22carcass disposal sites under s. 29.063 (7).SB550,3,723(2) Chronic wasting disease education. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) 1for the appropriation to the department of natural resources under s. 20.370 (1) 2(mu), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $250,000 to provide 3education to hunters about chronic wasting disease and the importance of proper 4carcass disposal. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the 5department of natural resources under s. 20.370 (1) (mu), the dollar amount for 6fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $250,000 to provide education to hunters about 7chronic wasting disease and the importance of proper carcass disposal.SB550,3,88